Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-12,192
Rules and regulations.

Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act, the director may adopt and promulgate all procedures and rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of the act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 108.